New York, session 2025-2026, S5643.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be designated as the 4 "Dwight 'Heavy D' Myers Way". All that portion of the state highway 5 system constituting state route 22 between Lorraine Avenue and Lincoln 6 Avenue in the city of Mount Vernon, county of Westchester, shall be 7 designated and known as the "Dwight 'Heavy D' Myers Way". 8 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 9 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 10 as designated pursuant to section one of this act. However, to avoid 11 confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the desig- 12 nation called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one of 13 ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway shall not be 14 changed as a result of this act. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10257-01-5